Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2057.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3 of the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Bicameral Committee on Regulatory Review." The Bicameral 12345678910111213141516171819202122 Committee on Regulatory Review established under section 11(a.1).* * *Section 2. Section 5(b) of the act is amended and subsection (a) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 5. Proposed regulations; procedures for review.(a) On the same date that an agency submits a proposed regulation to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication of notice of proposed rulemaking in the Pennsylvania Bulletin as required by the Commonwealth Documents Law, the agency shall submit to the commission and the committees a copy of the proposed regulation and a regulatory analysis form which includes the following:* * *(15) A list of relevant stakeholders, along with the stakeholders' contact information, who would be impacted by the regulation.(b) The requirements of subsection (a) shall not diminish the requirements of section 201 of the Commonwealth Documents Law, but the information required by this section may be included in the Notice of Proposed Rulemaking published in the Pennsylvania Bulletin in lieu of the information required by paragraphs (2) and (3) of section 201 of the Commonwealth Documents Law. The agency shall hold a public comment period which shall commence with the publication of the notice of proposed rulemaking and shall continue for not less than 30 days unless section 203(1) or (2) of the Commonwealth Documents Law applies. Prior to the end of the public comment period, the commission shall provide notice of the rulemaking to the list of stakeholders provided by the agency under subsection (a)(15).20250HB2057PN2635 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 3. Section 5.1 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 5.1. Final-form regulations and final-omitted regulations; procedures for review.* * *(b.1) The commission shall provide notice of the final rulemaking to the list of stakeholders provided by the agency under section 5(a)(15).* * *Section 4. Sections 7(b), (c), (c.1) and (d), 8.1 and 11 of the act are amended to read:Section 7. Procedures for subsequent review of disapproved final-form or final-omitted regulations.* * *(b) If the agency decides to adopt the final-form or final-omitted regulation without revisions or further modifications, the agency shall submit a report to the committees and the commission within [40] 30 days of the agency's receipt of the commission's disapproval order. The agency's report shall contain the final-form or final-omitted regulation, the commission's disapproval order and the agency's response and recommendations regarding the final-form or final-omitted regulation. If the committees are prevented from receiving the report because of adjournment sine die or expiration of the legislative session in an even-numbered year, the agency shall submit its report to the commission and the committees on the fourth Monday in January of the next year. If either committee has not been designated by the fourth Monday in January, the agency may not deliver the report to the committees and the 20250HB2057PN2635 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 commission until both committees are designated, but the agency shall deliver its report to the commission and the committees no later than the second Monday after the date by which both committee designations have been published in the Pennsylvania Bulletin. If the agency does not deliver the report to the committees and the commission in the time prescribed in this subsection, the agency shall be deemed to have withdrawn the final-form or final-omitted regulation.(c) If the agency decides to revise or modify the final-form or final-omitted regulation in order to respond to objections raised by the commission and adopt that regulation with revisions or modifications, the agency shall submit a report to the committees and the commission within [40] 20 days of the agency's receipt of the commission's disapproval order. The agency's report shall contain the revised final-form or final-omitted regulation, the findings of the commission, and the agency's response and recommendations regarding the revised final-form or final-omitted regulation. If the committees are prevented from receiving the report because of adjournment sine die or expiration of the legislative session in an even-numbered year, the agency shall submit the report to the commission and the committees on the fourth Monday in January of the next year. If either committee has not been designated by the fourth Monday in January, the agency may not deliver the report to the committees and the commission until both committees are designated, but the agency shall deliver its report to the commission and the committees no later than the second Monday after the date by which both committee designations have been published in the Pennsylvania Bulletin. If the agency does not deliver its report to the commission and the committees in the 20250HB2057PN2635 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 time prescribed in this subsection, the agency shall be deemed to have withdrawn the final-form or final-omitted regulation.(c.1) The commission may have until its next scheduled meeting, which occurs no less than [15] 10 days from receipt of the agency's report to approve or disapprove the agency's report. The commission shall deliver its approval or disapproval order to the committees for consideration by the General Assembly pursuant to subsection (d). If the commission is prevented from delivering its order to the committees within the time period provided for in this subsection because of the adjournment sine die or expiration of the legislative session in an even-numbered year, the commission shall deliver its order on the fourth Monday of January of the next year. If either committee has not been designated by the fourth Monday in January, the commission may not deliver its order to the committees until both committees are designated, but the commission shall deliver its order no later than the second Monday after the date by which both committee designations have been published in the Pennsylvania Bulletin. If the commission does not deliver its order disapproving the agency's report and revised final-form or final-omitted regulation in the time prescribed by this subsection, the commission shall be deemed to have approved the agency's report and the revised final-form or final-omitted regulation.(d) Upon receipt of the commission's order pursuant to subsection (c.1) or at the expiration of the commission's review period if the commission does not act on the regulation or does not deliver its order pursuant to subsection (c.1), one or both of the committees may, within 14 calendar days, report to the House of Representatives or Senate a concurrent resolution and 20250HB2057PN2635 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 notify the agency. During the 14-calendar-day period, the agency may not promulgate the final-form or final-omitted regulation. If, by the expiration of the 14-calendar-day period, neither committee reports a concurrent resolution, the committees shall be deemed to have approved the final-form or final-omitted regulation, and the agency may promulgate that regulation. If either committee reports a concurrent resolution before the expiration of the 14-day period, the Senate and the House of Representatives shall each have [30] 20 calendar days or ten legislative days, whichever is longer, from the date on which the concurrent resolution has been reported, to adopt the concurrent resolution. If the General Assembly adopts the concurrent resolution by majority vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives, the concurrent resolution shall be presented to the Governor in accordance with section 9 of Article III of the Constitution of Pennsylvania. If the Governor does not return the concurrent resolution to the General Assembly within ten calendar days after it is presented, the Governor shall be deemed to have approved the concurrent resolution. If the Governor vetoes the concurrent resolution, the General Assembly may override that veto by a two-thirds vote in each house. The Senate and the House of Representatives shall each have [30] 20 calendar days or ten legislative days, whichever is longer, to override the veto. If the General Assembly does not adopt the concurrent resolution or override the veto in the time prescribed in this subsection, it shall be deemed to have approved the final-form or final-omitted regulation. Notice as to any final disposition of a concurrent resolution considered in accordance with this section shall be published in the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The bar on promulgation 20250HB2057PN2635 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the final-form or final-omitted regulation shall continue until that regulation has been approved or deemed approved in accordance with this subsection. If the General Assembly adopts the concurrent resolution and the Governor approves or is deemed to have approved the concurrent resolution or if the General Assembly overrides the Governor's veto of the concurrent resolution, the agency shall be barred from promulgating the final-form or final-omitted regulation. If the General Assembly does not adopt the concurrent resolution or if the Governor vetoes the concurrent resolution and the General Assembly does not override the Governor's veto, the agency may promulgate the final-form or final-omitted regulation. The General Assembly may, at its discretion, adopt a concurrent resolution disapproving the final-form or final-omitted regulation to indicate the intent of the General Assembly but permit the agency to promulgate that regulation.Section 8.1. Existing regulations.(a) The commission, on its motion or at the request of any person or member of the General Assembly, may review any existing regulation which has been in effect for at least three years. If a committee of the Senate or the House of Representatives requests a review of an existing regulation, the commission shall perform the review and shall assign it high priority. The commission may submit recommendations to an agency recommending changes in existing regulations if it finds the existing regulations to be contrary to the public interest under the criteria established in section 5.2. The commission may also make recommendations to the General Assembly and the Governor for statutory changes if the commission finds that any existing regulation may be contrary to the public interest.20250HB2057PN2635 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) (1) An agency shall rescind a regulation if the statutory authorization for the regulation is:(i) repealed;(ii) expired; or(iii) invalidated by court order.(2) For a regulation rescinded under paragraph (1), the agency shall:(i) publish notice of the rescinded regulation in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin; and(ii) transmit notice of the rescinded regulation to the appropriate standing committees of the Senate and the House of Representatives.Section 11. Regulations; regulatory review; annual reports; hearings and advisory group meetings.(a) The commission, in the performance of its functions under this act, has the power to promulgate and enforce regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this act. Regulations must be promulgated in accordance with the procedures established in the Commonwealth Documents Law. The regulations shall provide for the commission's notification of filings of final-form and final-omitted regulations to parties likely to be affected by the final-form and final-omitted regulations through publication of a notice in the Pennsylvania Bulletin. Prior to the regulations taking effect, the requirements of this act must be satisfied. For the purposes of reviewing the regulations of the commission and otherwise satisfying the requirements of this act, the [Joint] Bicameral Committee on [Documents] Regulatory Review shall exercise the rights and perform the functions of the commission, and the 20250HB2057PN2635 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 commission shall exercise the rights and perform the functions of an agency under this act.(a.1) (1) The Bicameral Committee on Regulatory Review is established as an agency of the General Assembly, which shall consist of the following members:(i) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Intergovernmental Operations Committee of the Senate.(ii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the State Government Committee of the House of Representatives.(2) The members of the bicameral committee shall serve without compensation other than reimbursement for travel and other actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. Reimbursement of expenses shall be paid by the legislative chamber to which the member is elected.(3) Three members of the bicameral committee shall constitute a quorum, and the committee shall select from among its members a chairperson and a vice chairperson, and shall elect a secretary who need not be a member of the committee.(4) The bicameral committee shall exercise the powers and perform the duties vested in and imposed upon it by this act and any other powers and duties vested in and imposed upon the committee by law.(b) On or before April 1, the commission shall file an annual report of its activities for the prior calendar year with the Governor and the General Assembly.(c) The commission may hold public hearings on any matter before the commission and may meet with advisory groups regarding matters before the commission.20250HB2057PN2635 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2057PN2635 - 10 - 1